lexc-files/derivational-suffixes/noun-suffixing/noun-derivSuffix_semiFinalE.txt
^––iigh(N→V):^%{.mm.%}iigh                 VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to fix N; to make N; to prepare N; to cook N
^~fiiraagh(N→V):^iiraagh                   VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to pretend by using N
^–lgigh(N→V):^%{.m.%}lgigh                 VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to travel using N
^–ligh(N→V):^%{.m.%}ligh                   VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to provide with N; to put N in
^–liigh(N→V):^%{.m.%}liigh                 VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to fix N; to make N; to prepare N; to cook N
^~fmiigh(N→V):^miigh                       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to hold in one's N; to put in one's N
^~%:(ng)igh(N→V):^%{.sf.%}igh              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to lose N; to be injured in one's N; to remove N
^–ngllagh(N→V):^%{.m.%}ngllagh             VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to make N (for (him) or out of (it))
^@~fniigh(N→V):^niigh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to hunt for N; to search for N; to ask for N; to endeavor or to obtain N
^+saghtugh(N→V):^saghtugh                  VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to hunt N
^+siigh(N→V):^siigh                        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to get lots of N; to gather lots of N 
^+tagh(N→V):^tagh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! for N to continously occur; for N to repeatedly occur 
^+tugh(N→V):^tugh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to eat N
^+tutkaligh(N→V):^tutkaligh                VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to measure the approximate the N of (it)
^@~fyagh(N→V):^yagh                        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to go to celebrate N; to hunt N
^–ghte(N→V):^%{.m.%}gh%{t%}e               VerbPostbaseV;   ! to acquire the quality of n
^~–kaghte(N→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}kagh%{t%}e  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to get N; to catch N
^~–kegte(N→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}keg%{t%}e    VerbPostbaseV;   ! to have good N
^–ksagute(N→V):^%{.m.%}ksagu%{t%}e         VerbPostbaseV;   ! to acquire as one's N
^–liite(N→V):^%{.m.%}lii%{t%}e             VerbPostbaseV;   ! to have obtained (object) as one's N
^~fmete(N→V):^me%{t%}e                     VerbPostbaseV;   ! to be at N; to be in N
^–msuggiite(N→V):^%{.m.%}msuggii%{t%}e     VerbPostbaseV;   ! to completely lack N
^~%:(ng)i%:ghute(N→V):^ii{t%}e             VerbPostbaseV;   ! to become N-less; to have lost one's N
^~%:(ng)ughte(N→V):^%{.sf.%}ugh%{t%}e      VerbPostbaseV;   ! to become N; for there to start to be N (weather condition)
^+nite(N→V):^ni%{t%}e                      VerbPostbaseV;   ! to taste of N
^–pagite(N→V):^%{.m.%}pagi%{t%}e           VerbPostbaseV;   ! for there not to be much N; to have few N
^+pagnite(N→V):^pagni%{t%}e                VerbPostbaseV;   ! to smell like N; to taste like N
^~–qite(N→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}qi%{t%}e      VerbPostbaseV;   ! to encounter N
^@~f–rakegte(N→V):^%{.m.%}rakeg%{t%}e      VerbPostbaseV;   ! to be very much an N
^+uute(N→V):^uu%{t%}e                      VerbPostbaseV;   ! to make the N sound 
^~%:(ng)ite(N→V):^%{.sf.%}i%{t%}e**        VerbPostbaseVI;  ! to lack N; to not have N
^+sugnite(N→V):^sugni%{t%}e*               VerbPostbaseVI;  ! to resemble N; to be like N
